Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.09
Beer wholesaler; delivery outside territory; unlawful; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any beer wholesaler to deliver beer to any retail licensee located outside the geographic territory designated on the beer wholesaler's license.

(2) If any person violates subsection (1) of this section, such person's license shall be suspended or revoked by the commission in the manner provided by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1976, LB 204, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 22.